North Carolina, session 2025, SB974.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 90-732 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-732. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
…
(9) Registered behavior technician. – An individual who is registered by the
certifying entity as a registered behavior technician."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 90-745 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-745. Exemptions from licensure.
An individual is exempt from the requirements of this Article if any of the following
conditions are met:
…
(2) The individual is a registered behavior technician delivering applied behavior
analysis services under the extended authority and direction of a licensed
behavior analyst, licensed assistant behavior analyst, or other professional
licensed under this Chapter or Chapter 90B of the General Statutes, so long as
the services of the licensed professional are within the scope of practice of the
license possessed by that licensed professional, and the services performed are
commensurate with the licensed professional's education, training, and
experience. The registered behavior technician does not design assessment or
intervention plans or procedures but delivers services as assigned by a
supervisor who is responsible for the registered behavior technician's work.
…."
SECTION 1.(c) Article 43 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding the following new sections to read:
"§ 90-745.1. Registered behavior technicians.
(a) At least ten percent (10%) of all services provided by a registered behavior technician
must involve the observation and direction of the registered behavior technician by a licensed
behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior analyst.
(b) Registered behavior technicians shall not have any individual, one-on-one contact
with a patient until they have provided 80 hours of applied behavior analysis services to patients
under the observation and direction of a licensed behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior
analyst.
"§ 90-746.1. Practice limitations.
*S974-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) No individual licensed or registered under this Article shall practice behavior analysis
via telehealth unless the patient is located in a county in this State with a population density of
less than 400 people per square mile.
(b) No individual licensed under this Article shall practice behavior analysis with a minor
for more than 16 hours in any seven-day period without the minor's parent or legal guardian being
physically present."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina
Behavior Analysis Board the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to adopt rules governing registered behavior technicians.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act is effective January 1, 2027. Section 2 of this act
is effective July 1, 2026. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 974-First Edition